Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-924
Official misconduct; penalty.

(1) A public servant commits official misconduct if he knowingly violates any statute or lawfully adopted rule or regulation relating to his official duties.

(2) Official misconduct is a Class II misdemeanor.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 209.

A sheriff who failed to receive a prisoner lawfully committed to jail for purposes of section 23-1703 was guilty of official misconduct. State v. Dailey, 314 Neb. 325, 990 N.W.2d 523 (2023).

Failure by a county attorney to reside in the county he or she holds office in is not official misconduct. Hynes v. Hogan, 251 Neb. 404, 558 N.W.2d 35 (1997).